Louisiana, session 2026, HB74.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 24-D of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 40:2529.1 through 2529.4, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 24-D. SPECTRUM ALERT ACT
§2529.1. Short title
This Chapter shall be known or may be cited as the "Spectrum Alert Act".
§2529.2. Administration; notification system
A. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
develop and implement a system to notify citizens when a child with Autism
Spectrum Disorder, hereinafter referred to in this Chapter as "ASD", is determined
to be missing and that an alert is to be issued to the community to assist law
enforcement officials in locating the missing child with ASD.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-324 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 74
B. A notification system developed pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter
shall include, but not be limited to, the following items:
(1) Procedures to determine that the child with ASD is truly missing.
(2) Procedures for notifying the general public of the fact that a child with
ASD is missing.
(3) Whether the circumstances of the child deemed missing are aggravated
due to the age of the child or a life-threatening medical condition or situation which
requires the child to take life-sustaining medication.
(4) Coordinate with and encourage the private sector to participate in
secondary distribution, including the creation and distribution of flyers, electronic
mail, and text messaging of the missing child with ASD.
C. The alert shall be cancelled upon notification that the missing child has
been found or at the end of the notification period, whichever comes first. A local
law enforcement agency that locates a missing child who is the subject of an alert
shall notify the Department of Public Safety and Corrections or its designee, as soon
as possible that the missing child has been located.
D. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act, to implement the provisions of this Chapter.
§2529.3. Training program
In addition to, and in cooperation with, the notification system established by
R.S. 40:2529.2, the secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
shall develop a training program to equip law enforcement officers with the skills to
understand ASD and other mental illnesses, de-escalate interactions with children in
crisis, and respond effectively to a reported missing child with ASD.
§2529.4. Immunity from liability
Any state police officer, members of other law enforcement entities, radio or
television broadcasters, or cable television operators, who transmit or display, or who
fail to transmit or display such information concerning a missing child with ASD,
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-324 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 74
and other entities who may become an active component of this effort, shall not be
liable for any civil damages or criminal penalties as a result of any acts or omissions
relative to the "Spectrum Alert" program.